Utah statutes.
58-80-201.   Certification.
(1)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a
certificate as a certified medical language interpreter.
(2)  A certificate described in Subsection (1) shall specify the language that
the person is certified for.
(3)  This chapter prohibits a person from representing or holding oneself out
as a certified medical language interpreter if the person does not have a
certificate described in Subsection (1).
